Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
87A

HAWAII EMPLOYER-UNION HEALTH BENEFITS TRUST FUND

Part I. General Provisions

Section

87A-1 Definitions

Part II. Board of Trustees

87A-5 Composition of board

87A-6 Term of a trustee; vacancy

87A-7 Chair, vice-chair, and secretary-treasurer

87A-8 Compensation and expenses

87A-9 Legal adviser

87A-10 Meetings; notice

87A-11 Quorum; board actions; voting

87A-12 Records and minutes

Part III. Board Powers and Duties

87A-15 Administration of the fund

87A-16 Health benefits plan; carriers

87A‑16.3 Prescription drugs; mail order opt
out option

87A-17 Group life insurance benefits or group
life insurance

program

87A-18 Long-term care benefits plan; carrier or
third-party

administrator

87A-19 Plans for part-time, temporary, and
seasonal or casual

employees

87A-20 Repealed

87A-21 Eligibility

87A-22 Benefits plan information and enrollment

87A-23 Health benefits plan supplemental to
medicare

87A-24 Other powers

87A-25 Other duties

87A-26 Rules; policies, standards, and procedures

Part IV. Trust Fund

87A-30 Hawaii employer-union health benefits
trust fund;

establishment

87A-31 Trust fund; purpose

87A-31.1 Public employers; defined

87A-31.5 Employer contributions irrevocable

87A-32 State and county contributions; active
employees

87A-33 State and county contributions; retired
employees

87A-33.5 State and county contribution;
reimbursement for

retired employees

87A-34 State and county contributions; retired
employees with

fewer than ten years of service

87A-35 State and county contributions; employees
hired after

June 30, 1996, but before July 1, 2001,
and retired

with fewer than twenty-five years of
service

87A-36 State and county contributions; employees
hired after

June 30, 2001, and retired

87A-37 Group life insurance benefits plans for
retired

employees; contributions

87A-38 State and county contributions not
considered wages or

salary

87A-39 Reimbursement for state contributions

87A-40 Employee-beneficiary contributions; health
benefit

plans

87A-41 Employee-beneficiary or
qualified-beneficiary

contributions; long-term care benefits
plan

87A-42 Other post-employment benefits trust

87A-43 Payment of public employer contributions
to the other

post-employment benefits trust

Note

Applicability of the following to health benefits plans under
this chapter:

(1) Coverage for annual screenings of sexually transmitted
diseases, including screenings for human immunodeficiency virus and acquired
immunodeficiency syndrome, required by L 2016, c 204. L 2016, c 204, §6;

(2) Nondiscrimination provisions required by L 2016, c 135.
L 2016, c 135, §5;

(3) Reimbursement for prescription contraceptive supplies
required by L 2016, c 205. L 2016, c 205, §4; and

(4) Requirement for reimbursement for telehealth services by
L 2016, c 226. L 2016, c 226, §13.

Cross References

Hawaii health authority, see chapter 322H.

Health and dental insurance data; mandatory reporting for
certain insurers, see §323D-18.5.

Prescription drug benefits, see chapter 431R.

Case Notes

This chapter's use of
general trust language does not impose upon the trustees all of the common law
fiduciary duties; although this chapter does not use "discretion" in
requiring the board to decide upon the structure of the health benefits plan,
the legislature clearly intended that the board have broad discretion in its
design; where trustees expressed concern regarding the impact a change to a
three- or four-tier structure would have on the collective bargaining process,
and also determined that the two-tiered structure would have a negative impact
on the smallest percentage of plan participants, trustees did not abuse their
discretion. 115 H. 126, 165 P.3d 1027.

The words
"similarly situated beneficiary not eligible for medicare", as those
words are used in §87A-23(1), or "similarly situated employee-beneficiary
not eligible for medicare", as those words are used in §87A-23(3), invoke
a comparison between medicare eligible retirees and retirees who do not qualify
for medicare; thus, this chapter does not require the board of the
employer-union health benefits trust fund to provide health benefits plans to
retirees whose benefits "reasonably approximate" those benefits
provided to active employees. 122 H. 402, 228 P.3d 282.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next